Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4512
Rules and regulations for disclosure.

The director may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act that include standards for full and fair disclosure setting forth the manner, content, and required disclosures for the sale of long-term care insurance policies, terms of renewability, initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility, nonduplication of coverage provisions, coverage of dependents, preexisting conditions, termination of insurance, continuation or conversion, probationary periods, limitations, exceptions, reductions, elimination periods, requirements for replacement, recurrent conditions, and definitions of terms.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 273.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.